Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.630

Influencing voter to withhold vote.

Any person who in any way, directly or indirectly, by menace or unlawful means, attempts to influence any person in refusing to give his or her vote in any primary or special or general election is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2003 c 111 s 2129. Prior: 1991 c 81 s 6; 1965 c 9 s 29.85.070; prior: Code 1881 s 3140; RRS s 5389. Formerly RCW 29.85.070.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 81: See note following RCW 29A.84.540.